Hawaii statutes.
[§421C-33] Volunteers exempted. (a)
For the purposes of this section, "volunteer" means an individual
who:

(1) Is a member of an association;

(2) Is not an employee of the association; and

(3) Who volunteers and donates up to twenty-five
hours of labor and services per month to the association.

(b) Associations may accept labor and services
from volunteers.

(c) In addition to any exemptions granted to
nonpaid labor, volunteers who acknowledge in writing that they are volunteers
shall be construed not to be in the employ of the association, their labor and
services shall be construed to not be employment, and they shall not be
construed to be employees of the association, under title 21 or any other labor
law. [L 1982, c 97, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next